California statutes. Education Code
 provide a written notice of going concern determination to the county board of education and the county superintendent of schools and the basis for the determination. The notification shall include the assumptions used in making the determination and shall be available to the public. The Superintendent shall take all actions that are necessary, including at least one of the following, to ensure that the county office of education meets its financial obligations:

(1) Assign a fiscal expert, paid for by the Superintendent, to advise the county office of education on its financial problems.

(2) Conduct a study of the financial and budgetary conditions of the
 county office of
 education that includes, but is not limited to, a review of the county office of education’s internal controls. If in the course of this review, the Superintendent determines that their office requires analytical assistance or expertise that is not available through the county office, the Superintendent may employ, at the county office of education’s expense, on a short-term basis, staff, including certified public accountants, to provide the assistance and expertise.

(3) Direct the county office of education to submit a financial projection of all fund and cash balances of the county office of education as of June 30 of the current year and subsequent fiscal years as the Superintendent requires.

(4) Require the county office of education to encumber all contracts and other obligations, to prepare appropriate cashflow analyses and monthly
 or quarterly budget revisions, and to appropriately record all receivables and payables.

(5) Direct the county office of education to submit a proposal for addressing the fiscal conditions that resulted in the determination that the county office of education may not be able to meet its financial obligations.

(6) Withhold compensation of the county board of education and the county superintendent of schools for failure to provide requested financial information.

(c) If, after taking the actions identified in subdivision (a), the Superintendent determines that a county office of education will be unable to meet its financial obligations for the current or subsequent fiscal
 year or if a county office of education experiences a significant fiscal event that is determined by the Superintendent to have an immediate severe fiscal impact that will cause a county office of education to be unable to meet its financial obligations for the current or subsequent fiscal year, the Superintendent shall notify the county board of education, the county superintendent of
 schools, and the president of the state board, or the president’s designee, in writing of that determination and the basis for that determination. The notification shall include the assumptions used in making the determination and shall be available to the public.

(d) If the Superintendent makes a determination specified in subdivision (c) or if the county office of education has a negative certification
 pursuant to Section 1240, the
 Superintendent shall make a report to the president of the state board, or the president’s designee, about the financial condition of the county office of education and remedial actions proposed by the Superintendent and shall take all actions that are necessary to ensure that the county office of education meets its financial obligations,
 including at least one of the following actions:

(1) Develop and impose, in consultation with the county board of education and the county superintendent, a budget revision that will enable the county office of education to meet its financial obligations in the current fiscal year.

(2) Stay or rescind
 all actions determined to be inconsistent with the ability of the county office of education to meet its obligations for the current or subsequent fiscal year, including all actions up to the point that the subsequent year’s budget is approved by the Superintendent. The Superintendent shall inform the county board of education and the county superintendent of schools in writing of the Superintendent’s justification for
 all exercises of authority under this paragraph.

(3) Assist in developing, in consultation with the county board of education and the county superintendent of schools, a multiyear financial recovery plan that will enable the county office of education to meet its future obligations.

(4) Assist in developing, in consultation with the county board of education and the county superintendent, a budget for the subsequent fiscal year. If necessary, the Superintendent shall continue to work with the county board of education and the county superintendent until the budget for the subsequent year is adopted by the county board of education and approved by the Superintendent.

(5) As necessary, appoint a
 fiscal adviser to perform one or more of the duties prescribed by this subdivision on behalf of the Superintendent.

(e) All actions taken by the Superintendent pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (d) shall be accompanied by a notification that includes the actions to be taken, the reasons for the actions, and the assumptions used to support the necessity for the actions. That notification shall be available to the public.

(f) This section does not
 authorize the Superintendent to abrogate a provision of a collective bargaining agreement that was entered into by a county office of education before the date
 that the Superintendent assumed authority pursuant to subdivision (d).

(g) The county office of education shall pay 75 percent of, and the Superintendent shall pay 25 percent of, the administrative expenses incurred pursuant to subdivision (d) or costs associated with improving the county office of education’s financial management practices.

(h) Notwithstanding any other law, a county treasurer shall not honor a warrant when the Superintendent, as
 appropriate, has disapproved that warrant, or has disapproved the order on county office of education funds for which a warrant was prepared.

(i) For all purposes of errors and liability insurance policies, a fiscal expert appointed pursuant to this section shall be deemed to be an employee of the county office of education. The Superintendent may require that the fiscal adviser be placed on the county office of education payroll for purposes of remuneration, benefits, and payroll deductions.

(j) If staff persons are hired pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), the Superintendent may certify to the Controller an amount to be transferred to the department, from the funds that otherwise would be apportioned to the county office of education pursuant to Section 2574 or 2575, for the purpose of paying all costs incurred by that staff in performing their respective services. The
 Controller, upon receipt of that certification, shall transfer that amount.

(k) To facilitate the appointment of a county office of education fiscal officer and the employment of additional staff pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2), respectively, of subdivision (b), for purposes of those paragraphs, the Superintendent is exempt from the requirements of Article 6 (commencing with Section 999) of Chapter 6 of Division 4 of the Military and Veterans Code and Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 8, Sec. 3.   (AB 121)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1631.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the Superintendent shall not make an apportionment of state or federal funds for the current fiscal year for a county office of education if the county board of education or county superintendent of schools of the county office of education neglects or refuses to meet any of the following requirements:

(1) Adopt a local control and accountability plan pursuant to Section 52066.

(2) Adopt an annual update to a local control and accountability plan pursuant to Section 52067.

(3) Adopt an annual budget pursuant to this article.

(4) Submit reports pursuant to subdivision (l) of Section 1240.

(b) The Superintendent shall withhold apportionments pursuant to subdivision (a), including previously withheld apportionments for the current fiscal year, until the requirements listed in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a) are met, and shall notify the appropriate county official that the Superintendent shall not approve any warrants issued by the county office of education.

(c) If a county board of education or county superintendent of schools is unable to fulfill one or more requirements described in subdivision (a) due to any of the events described in subdivision (a) of Section 46392, the county board of education or county superintendent of schools shall, at the earliest opportunity after the event no longer exists, fulfill those
 requirements and shall submit to the Superintendent the following information:

(1) A description of the emergency event.

(2) The date that the requirements described in subdivision (a) were met.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 8, Sec. 4.   (AB 121)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1632.

(a) In order for the Superintendent to perform their fiscal oversight responsibilities pursuant to Sections 1240, 1622, and 1630, the Superintendent may request from the county superintendent of the Counties of Alpine, Amador, Del Norte, Mariposa, Plumas, and Sierra and of the City and County of San Francisco and any applicable school district view-only access to the local financial system operated by the county office of education and the school district. Upon receiving a request from the Superintendent, the county superintendent and the school district shall provide access to the Superintendent within 30 calendar days.

(b) The Superintendent may direct the county auditor to withhold payment of any stipend, expenses, benefits, or salaries and
 wages of the county superintendent, the superintendent of the school district, or members of the governing board of the county office of education or school district, as appropriate, for failure to provide access within 30 calendar days. The payments shall be withheld until access to the local financial system is provided to the Superintendent. If the county superintendent performs the functions of the county auditor, the Superintendent may direct the county superintendent to withhold the payments specified in this subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 2.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. County School Service Fund Programs and Services [1700. - 1946.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [1700. - 1704.]

1700.

The Legislature hereby declares that it is in the interest of the state and of the people for the office of the county superintendent of schools, through the county school service fund, to provide coordination of the educational program among school districts and community college districts in the territory under his or her jurisdiction and to provide professional and financial assistance to school districts and community college districts which otherwise, because of size or location, would not be able to furnish a satisfactory program of education for their children. That assistance is a matter of general concern inasmuch as the education of the children of the state is an obligation and function of the state.

In adopting this chapter, the Legislature considers that the coordination of the educational program constitutes the greatest continuing need to be met through the county school service fund. To meet this need the necessity is recognized to provide professional services to coordinate courses of study, guidance services, health services, school library services, special education, and attendance activities.

As an additional need, the Legislature recognizes the necessity to provide professional services in districts too small to supply services for themselves economically and effectively, such as, (a) to prepare courses of study; (b) to supervise instructional practices; (c) to provide direct guidance services, health services, and attendance services normally provided in an educational program; (d) to provide for the purchase, distribution, and use of supplementary instructional materials and equipment; and (e) to provide educational opportunity to normal and special pupils who would otherwise be denied it. It is recognized further that providing for professional service is a transitory function of the county school service fund to be assumed by school districts and community college districts when, through growth or reorganization, they will be able to perform the services for themselves.

It is the further intent of the Legislature that:

(a) Services involving the coordination of the educational program which have among others the purposes of (1) enforcing minimum standards, (2) improving the educational program, and (3) promoting order and reasonable uniformity in the educational program shall be provided, except as may be specifically authorized, at the district level, reserving to the district the opportunity and responsibility for internal improvement, and that those services will be provided in a manner that recognition will be given to the responsibilities placed upon school districts and community college districts, by the Legislature to determine and administer their own educational program.

(b) Services to school districts and community college districts, which do not constitute coordination among districts shall be provided in a manner that impetus will be given to strengthening school districts and community college districts, and to improving district organization to the end that more effective programs of education may be offered, and that the provision of services through the county school service fund shall not act to deter or delay any school districts and community college districts, from furnishing the services for themselves.

(c) Services to school districts and community college districts, shall be cooperatively provided by two or more county superintendents of schools without regard for county boundaries whenever a particular service may be so provided with economy and effectiveness.

(d) The direct operation of an educational program by the county superintendent of schools shall, except as specifically authorized by the Legislature, be limited to those emergency cases where children would otherwise be denied an opportunity for education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

1701.

Any services of the county superintendent of schools authorized by this chapter which relate to the coordination of the educational program or coordination of the course of study among districts under his jurisdiction, the preparation of courses of study, the development of courses of study or curricula materials, or research or development studies in connection with the curricular and special services of the county superintendent of schools are subject to the budget and other restrictions of Section 14052 and any other applicable sections.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1702.

The county school service fund shall be used to pay for those services provided by the county superintendent of schools that are authorized by this chapter, and for such other purposes as are specifically authorized in Section 1500.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1703.

The county superintendent of schools may, with the approval of the county board of education and in accordance with regulations of the Superintendent that the Superintendent is authorized to adopt, employ qualified personnel to provide for the coordination of courses of study, guidance services, health services, school library services, special education, and attendance activities among the school districts under the county superintendent’s jurisdiction. The regulations of the Superintendent adopted pursuant to this section shall be adopted with the advice of an advisory committee to include county superintendents of schools, which the Superintendent may by this provision appoint.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 1.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1704.

The services described in Section 1703 shall, except in advisory services in school business administration activities, clerical, accounting, and stenographic services, be performed by persons who hold a valid credential, or a life diploma based thereon, authorizing administrative services.

Any person who is, and continuously since September 7, 1955, has been, employed in the office of a county superintendent of schools and is performing any of the services described in Sections 1703 and 1704 may continue to perform such services without possessing the credential otherwise required as long as he remains continuously employed in his position.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Preparation of Courses of Studies [1720. - 1723.]

1720.

The county superintendent of schools may, with the approval of the county board of education, and in cooperation with school districts and community college districts provide for the preparation of courses of study and the development of curriculum and instructional materials to be used in the elementary and secondary schools.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1721.

The county superintendent of schools may, with the approval of the county board of education, enter into an agreement with the governing board of any school district and community college districts in the territory under his or her jurisdiction, other than specified in Section 1720, to provide for the preparation of courses of study by the county superintendent of schools for use in the districts. The agreement shall provide for the payment of the cost of services rendered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

1722.

The county superintendent of schools, with the approval of the county board of education, and in cooperation with school districts and community college districts and the State Department of Education, or the board of governors, according to jurisdiction may participate in projects for developmental program planning.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1723.

The services described in Sections 1720, 1721 and 1722, except clerical, accounting, and stenographic services, shall be performed by persons who hold a valid credential, or a life diploma based thereon, authorizing administrative services.

Any person who is, and continuously since September 7, 1955, has been, employed in the office of a county superintendent of schools and is performing the services described in this article may continue to perform such services without possessing the credential otherwise required as long as he remains continuously employed in his position.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Supervision of Instruction [1730. - 1732.]

1730.

The county superintendent of schools may, with the approval of the county board of education, employ supervisors to supervise instruction in the elementary school districts under his jurisdiction which had less than 901 units of average daily attendance during the preceding fiscal year and in the elementary schools of unified school districts under his jurisdiction which had less than 1,501 units of average daily attendance during the preceding fiscal year. The services of supervisors shall be made available in such elementary and unified districts in which adequate supervision of instruction is not being provided by the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1731.

The county superintendent of schools may, with the approval of the county board of education, enter into an agreement with the governing board of any elementary school district under his jurisdiction for the supervision of instruction in the district by the county superintendent of schools. The agreement shall provide for the payment of the cost of providing the supervision of instruction. The county superintendent of schools shall transfer from the funds of the district to the county school service fund the amounts set forth in the agreement.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1732.

The services described in Sections 1730 and 1731 shall be performed by persons who hold a valid credential issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing authorizing that service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 471, Sec. 1.   (SB 1329)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Supervision of Attendance [1740. - 1742.]

1740.

The county superintendent of schools may, with the approval of the county board of education, employ personnel to supervise the attendance of pupils in elementary school districts under his jurisdiction which had less than 901 units of average daily attendance during the preceding fiscal year, in high school districts under his jurisdiction which had less than 301 units of average daily attendance during the preceding fiscal year, and in unified school districts under his jurisdiction which had less than 1,501 units of average daily attendance during the preceding fiscal year, if the districts are not served by any district supervisor of attendance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1741.

The county superintendent of schools may, with the approval of the county board of education, provide for the supervision of the attendance of pupils in school districts under his jurisdiction other than specified in Section 1740. The county superintendent of schools shall transfer from the funds of the district to the county school service fund an amount equal to the actual cost of providing for the supervision of attendance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1742.

The services described in Sections 1740 and 1741 shall be performed by persons who hold a valid credential issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing authorizing performance of the service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 471, Sec. 2.   (SB 1329)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Supervision of Health [1750. - 1754.]

1750.

The county superintendent of schools may, with the approval of the county board of education, employ one or more supervisors of health, as supervisors of health are defined in Section 49420, to provide health services to pupils in elementary school districts under his jurisdiction which had less than 901 units of average daily attendance during the preceding fiscal year, to pupils in high school districts under his jurisdiction which had less than 301 units of average daily attendance during the preceding fiscal year, and to pupils in unified school districts under his jurisdiction which had less than 1,501 units of average daily attendance during the preceding fiscal year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1751.

In lieu of employing supervisors of health, the county superintendent of schools may, with the approval of the county board of education, contract with the board of supervisors of the county in which he holds office, or with any local health district located wholly or partially within such county, for the provision of health services by employees of the county health department or local health district to pupils in the school districts specified in Section 1750.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1752.

The county superintendent of schools may, with the approval of the county board of education, enter into an agreement with the governing board of any school district under his jurisdiction for the provision of any or all health services to the district by the county superintendent of schools. The agreement shall provide for the payment of the cost of providing the services. The county superintendent of schools shall transfer from the funds of the district to the county school service fund the amounts set forth in the agreement.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1753.

The services described in Sections 1750, 1751, and 1752 shall be performed by persons who hold a valid health and development credential, or life diploma based thereon, or a services credential with a specialization in health issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 471, Sec. 3.   (SB 1329)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1754.

A supervisor of health employed by the county superintendent of schools shall perform such duties in connection with the supervision of health of pupils as are prescribed by the county superintendent of schools. All rules governing health services provided pursuant to Sections 1750, 1751, or 1752 shall be made by the county superintendent of schools.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Provision of Guidance Services [1760. - 1762.]

1760.

The county superintendent of schools may, with the approval of the county board of education, employ personnel to provide necessary guidance services to pupils in elementary school districts under his jurisdiction which had less than 901 units of average daily attendance during the preceding fiscal year, in high school districts under his jurisdiction which had less than 301 units of average daily attendance during the preceding fiscal year, and in unified school districts under his jurisdiction which had less than 1,501 units of average daily attendance during the preceding fiscal year; provided, adequate guidance services are not being furnished by the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1761.

The county superintendent of schools may, with the approval of the county board of education, enter into an agreement with the governing board of any district for the provision of guidance services in the district by the county superintendent of schools. The agreement shall provide for the payment by the district of the cost of providing the guidance services. The county superintendent of schools shall transfer from the funds of the district to the county school service fund the amounts set forth in the agreement.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1762.

The services described in Sections 1760 and 1761 shall be performed by persons who hold a valid credential issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing authorizing performance of the services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 471, Sec. 4.   (SB 1329)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Provision of Library Services [1770. - 1775.]

1770.

(a) The county superintendent of schools may, with the approval of the county board of supervisors and the county board of education, agree with the county librarian to take over all existing contracts for supplementary books and other material adopted for the course of study between the school districts or community college districts and the county librarian entered into pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 18130) of Chapter 2 of Part 11. Thereafter, the county superintendent of schools shall generally perform the library services for the school districts or community college districts that were previously performed by the county library.

(b) After the above agreement has been entered into, the governing board of
 any district that had not yet joined the county library may enter into an agreement with the county superintendent of schools for the performance of school library services upon the terms and conditions fixed in the contracts or agreements.

(c) Whenever the county superintendent of schools performs school library services for any district, the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 18130) of Chapter 2 of Part 11, so far as applicable, shall control. The county superintendent of schools shall employ a librarian holding a valid credential authorizing services as a librarian issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing. The county superintendent of schools shall also employ the assistants that may be necessary to carry on this service. The cost of the salaries of the librarian and assistants, and the other necessary expenses of maintenance of the library, including necessary supplies, equipment, and books, may be paid from the
 county school service fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 471, Sec. 5.   (SB 1329)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1771.

(a) The county superintendent of schools of any county in which no county library is maintained may, with the approval of the county board of education, establish and maintain a county school library service for elementary school districts of the county that elect to participate in that service.

(b) Upon the governing board of any elementary school district electing to participate in that service, the governing board of the elementary school district shall enter into an agreement with the county superintendent of schools, and the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 18130) of Chapter 2 of Part 11 shall control and be applicable in the same manner as they apply to a school district that enters into an agreement for
 school library services from the county library.

(c) The county superintendent of schools shall have the same powers, duties, responsibilities, and jurisdiction with respect to the furnishing and performance of library services to elementary school districts that have elected to participate in the county school library service as may be exercised by a county library with respect to school library services.

(d) Whenever the county superintendent of schools establishes and maintains a county school library service pursuant to subdivision (a), the county superintendent of schools shall employ a librarian holding a valid credential authorizing service as a school librarian issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.

(e) The county superintendents of schools of two or more contiguous counties that have established
 county school library services pursuant to this section may cooperate with each other and to that end may enter into agreements with each other, and may do any and all things necessary or convenient to aid and cooperate in carrying out this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 471, Sec. 6.   (SB 1329)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1772.

The county superintendent of schools may, with the approval of the county board of education, agree with the proper authorities of the county to transfer funds from the county school service fund to the county library for the purchase of such books and other materials as are adopted by the body authorized to adopt courses of study for the school districts of this county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1773.

The county superintendent of schools of any county maintaining one or more emergency elementary schools may, if the county maintains a county library, enter into an agreement with the proper authorities of the county to provide school library services in each of the schools under such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon. The agreement may, among other matters, provide for the payment by the county superintendent of schools to the proper authorities for the use of the county library from the county school service fund of such money at such times as may be agreed upon. All money transferred shall be used solely by the authorities of the county library for the purchase of books and other materials as may be adopted by the county board of education and for the care and distribution of such books and other materials to the schools.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1774.

(a) The county superintendent of schools may establish a county teachers’ library and expend from the county school service fund such amounts as are necessary for the purchase of books therefor and for the payment of the necessary expenses of maintenance thereof.

(b) If there is a county library in any county, the county superintendent of schools may enter into an agreement with the county library for the transfer to it of all books and other property belonging to the county teachers’ library and may order such sums to be transferred from the county school service fund as are necessary for expenditure for the purchase and maintenance of books of professional interest to teachers. Thereupon the teachers’ library shall be administered as a part of the county library.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

1775.

Whenever the county superintendent of schools assumes responsibility for the establishment of a library or the performance of library services pursuant to this article, the county superintendent shall, on or before August 31st, in each year, report to the State Department of Education on the condition of the libraries under his supervision, for the year ending June 30th preceding. The reports of the superintendent shall, in addition to other matters deemed expedient by the librarian and the superintendent, contain such statistical and other information as is deemed desirable by the State Department of Education. For this purpose the State Department of Education may send to the several county superintendents or librarians instructions or question blanks so as to obtain the material for a comparative study of library conditions in the state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14.5. Education of Prisoners [1900. - 1909.5.]

1900.

The county superintendent of schools, with the approval of the county board of education and the board of supervisors, shall have power to establish and maintain classes or schools for prisoners in any county jail, county honor farm, or any county industrial farm or county or joint county road camp, for the purpose of providing instruction in civic, vocational, literacy, health, family and consumer sciences, technical, and general education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 543, Sec. 1.   (AB 1595)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1901.

The county board of education shall have the authority to award diplomas or certificates to prisoners enrolled in classes or schools in any county jail, county honor farm, or any county industrial farm or county or joint county road camp upon successful completion of a prescribed course of study.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1267.)
-------------------------------------------

1902.

The county board of education may provide for the maintenance on Saturday of classes for prisoners in any county jail, county honor farm, or any county industrial farm or county or joint county road camp.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1267.)
-------------------------------------------

1903.

(a) For purposes of attendance, “adult” means any prisoner confined in any county jail, county honor farm, county industrial farm, county or joint county road camp, or community-based correction program, and who has enrolled in classes or schools authorized by Section 1900.

(b) This chapter is applicable to a community-based correction program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1158, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1904.

For all schools or classes maintained by the county superintendent of schools as authorized by Section 1906 in any county jail, county honor farm, or any county industrial farm or county or joint county road camp, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall allow the amount computed under Section 1909. For purposes of this section, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall, by rules and regulations, establish minimum standards for the conduct of the schools or classes, including, but not necessarily limited to, class size, attendance requirements, and requirements concerning records to be kept and reports to be submitted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1267.)
-------------------------------------------

1905.

The sheriff or other official in charge of county correctional facilities may, subject to the approval of the board of supervisors, provide for the rehabilitation of prisoners confined in the county jail, county honor farm or any county industrial farm or county or joint county road camp. Such rehabilitation shall emphasize education and vocational training.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1267.)
-------------------------------------------

1906.

The board of supervisors may, by ordinance, direct the county superintendent of schools to establish and maintain classes or schools for prisoners in any county jail, county honor farm, or any county industrial farm or county or joint county road camp established by the county. The county board of education shall have the same powers and duties with respect to such schools, including the establishment of the budget deemed necessary for the operation of the school programs, as the governing board of a school district would have were such schools maintained by a school district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1267.)
-------------------------------------------

1907.

The board of supervisors, in lieu of proceeding under Section 1906, may provide for the establishment and maintenance of classes or schools in connection with the jail facilities for the education and vocational training of the prisoners. The board, by ordinance, may provide for the establishment and maintenance of school facilities in the county jail, county honor farm, or any county industrial farm or county or joint county road camp, and such schools may be maintained by the governing board of any school district maintaining secondary schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1267.)
-------------------------------------------

1908.

(a) The board of supervisors of the county shall transfer from the general fund of the county to the county school service fund of the county superintendent of schools such sums, in excess of the amount of money received from the state by the county superintendent of schools, as the county board of education has deemed necessary to maintain the school programs in the county jail, county honor farm, county industrial farm or county or joint county road camps as described in Section 1906.
